test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-yshtash-Hom2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ӹштӓш: # Verb-em 'do; try out'
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ӹштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ӹштет
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ӹштӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ӹштенӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ӹштедӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ӹштӓт
     
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#    
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: ӹштӹшӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: ӹштӹшӹц
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: ӹштӹш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: ӹштӹшнӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: ӹштӹшдӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: ӹштевӹ
     
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: ӹштенӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: ӹштенӓт
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: ӹштен
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: ӹштеннӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: ӹштендӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: ӹштенӹт
##   
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: ӹштӹделам
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2: ӹштӹделат
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: ӹштӹде 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: ӹштӹделна
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2: ӹштӹделда
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: ӹштӹделыт
##   
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Imprt+Sg2: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Imprt+Sg3: ӹштӹжӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Imprt+Pl2: ӹштӹдӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Imprt+Pl3: ӹштӹштӹ
##   
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+ImprtII+Sg2: ӹштемӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+ImprtII+Pl2: ӹштемӓдӓ
##   
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Sg1: ӹштӹнем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Sg2: ӹштӹнет
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Sg3: ӹштӹнежӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Pl1: ӹштӹненӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Pl2: ӹштӹнедӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнештӹ

##
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Inf: ӹштӓш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнештӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc: ӹштӹшӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹшӹ

     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹшӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹшӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Com: ӹштӹшӹге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹшӹлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹшӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ill: ӹштӹшӹшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Lat: ӹштӹшеш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Cmpr: ӹштӹшӹлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹшӹде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹшӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹшӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹшӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Com: ӹштӹшӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹшӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹшӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹшӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹшӹвлӓде

     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшем 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹшӹштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹшӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹшешем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹшӹлӓэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹшӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹшемде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹшемвлӓде

##   
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹмӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹмӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹмӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Com: ӹштӹмӹге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹмӹлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹмӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ill: [ӹштӹмӹшкӹ, ӹштӹмӹш]
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat: [ӹштӹмеш, ӹштӹмешкӹ]
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Cmpr: ӹштӹмӹлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹмӹде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹмӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹмӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹмӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Com: ӹштӹмӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹмӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹмӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹмӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹмӹвлӓде
 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмем 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹмӹштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹмӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹмешем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹмӹлӓэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹмӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹмемде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹмемвлӓде
## 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Com: ӹштӹдӹмӹге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹдӹмӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ill: ӹштӹдӹмӹшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat: ӹштӹдӹмеш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Cmpr: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмӹде
     
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Com: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓде
 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмем 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемӹн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемӹм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹдӹмӹштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹдӹмӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹдӹмешем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP: ӹштӹдӹмӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: ӹштӹдӹмемде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓде
